Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-2001. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Environmental Compliance Resource Act”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2002. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare of the state by:

Improving the operational efficiency of the Division of Environmental Quality concerning the resources provided to local governments and other state agencies, boards, and commissions;

Creating the Environmental Compliance Resource Program as a consolidated program to be administered by the division to provide resources to local governments and other state agencies, boards, and commissions;

Ensuring that cities, municipalities, counties, regional solid waste management districts, and state agencies, boards, and commissions have sufficient resources;

Authorizing the division to develop, implement, and administer an Environmental Compliance Resource Program; and

Modernizing, simplifying, and clarifying the law related to illegal dumping of solid waste and other similar issues that affect the public health, safety, and welfare.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2003. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Alleged violator” means a person that has been issued an environmental citation under this subchapter by an environmental officer;

“Cost statement” means a verified written statement that accounts for the cost of solid waste removal or other remediation, including without limitation receipts, and establishes that:

The solid waste was removed from the location or the environmental violation at the location was otherwise remediated; and

The solid waste was properly disposed of at one (1) or more of the following facilities:

A permitted solid waste disposal facility;

A permitted solid waste processing facility;

A recycling center;

A scrap yard that purchases iron, steel, aluminum, or other metals; or

Any other facility that an environmental officer finds to be a proper disposal facility for the solid waste;

“Environmental officer” means an employee of a city, county, municipality, regional solid waste management district created under § 8-6-701 et seq., or state agency, board, or commission who has:

Completed all requirements under this subchapter, including without limitation completing required training and passing the required examination, obtaining certification, being sworn in, and maintaining certification through continuing education; and

Authority to enter land to investigate and inspect as provided under § 8-1-107 to enforce environmental laws under the authority of the Division of Environmental Quality;

“Environmental violation” means an act or omission that:

Is prohibited under § 8-6-2005; or

Causes or results in the violation of a state law, rule, or order that is:

Designed to protect the public health, safety, or welfare; and

Applicable to this subchapter under § 8-6-2004;

“Illegal dumping of solid waste” means the illegal placing, depositing, dumping, or causing to be placed, deposited, or dumped by a person any solid waste that is prohibited by this chapter:

In or upon a public or private highway, road, or street, including a portion of the right-of-way in or upon a public or private highway, road, or street;

In or upon private property into or upon which the public is admitted by easement or license of the private property;

In or upon a public park or other public property; or

Upon property for which a permit has not been issued by the division;

“Illegal dump site” means a place where solid waste is disposed of in a manner that is prohibited by this chapter.

“Illegal dump site” includes a place where one (1) or more of the following exists:

An attractive nuisance;

A fire, health, or safety hazard;

A potential source of surface or groundwater contamination;

A waste tire site as defined in § 8-9-402; or

Other contamination that is hazardous to the public health or endangers the environment; and

“Person” means an individual, municipality, other governmental entity, or other entity that is recognized by law with rights and duties.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2004. Applicability.

This subchapter applies to the enforcement of illegal dumping of solid waste in violation of this subchapter and the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2005. Prohibited conduct.

An act or omission that results in one (1) or more of the following in this state is prohibited by this subchapter:

The illegal dumping of solid waste on public or private property;

The creation or participation in the creation or furtherance of an illegal dump site;

The disposal of solid waste that has resulted from a property owner's own household activities on his or her own land if the disposal:

Creates a public or private nuisance;

Is a hazard to health; or

Involves the open dumping of garbage; or

Any other environmental violation applicable to this subchapter under § 8-6-2004.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2006. Commission power and duties.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promulgate rules for the administration of the Environmental Compliance Resource Program under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2007. Division power and duties.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall develop, implement, and administer an Environmental Compliance Resource Program as provided under this subchapter and pursuant to the rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

The division shall designate at least one (1) employee as a program coordinator.

A program coordinator shall obtain the equivalent academic training and pass the equivalent test as an environmental officer under § 8-6-2010.

If an employee designated under subdivision (b)(1) of this section has met the requirements under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall issue a technical certificate that establishes that the employee holds the equivalent credentials as an individual who is certified as an environmental officer under § 8-6-2010.

An employee who is certified as an environmental officer and is a program coordinator may perform the duties of an environmental officer within the state as well as other duties assigned by the director.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2008. Environmental Compliance Resource Program.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her designee shall develop, implement, and administer the Environmental Compliance Resource Program.

The program shall provide:

Guidance and resources to all certified environmental officers;

Evaluation of all applicants for initial training as an environmental officer;

Coordination of training and examination of all potential environmental officers;

Certification to individuals who have completed the required environmental officer training and examination;

Coordination of continuing education for all certified environmental officers; and

Other services as determined necessary by the director.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2009. Promulgation of uniform environmental citation form.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall develop and promulgate a uniform environmental citation form based on the laws applicable to this subchapter under § 8-6-2004 and conduct prohibited under § 8-6-2005 in consultation with the Attorney General.

The uniform environmental citation form shall be used exclusively by all environmental officers in this state in issuing citations for environmental violations.

Subsection (a) of this section does not prohibit a municipality, city, county, or regional solid waste management district from promulgating citation forms for use in enforcement of violations of their local ordinances or bylaws for violations other than environmental violations.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2010. Applicant eligibility — Training and examination — Certification fees.

An individual is eligible to apply for initial training as an environmental officer if the individual is a current employee of a municipality, city, county, regional solid waste management district, or state agency, board, or commission.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall make the final determination on eligibility.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall designate approved environmental officer training and examination programs for eligible applicants and for annual renewals of the environmental certificate of a certified environmental officer.

An eligible applicant or a certified environmental officer is responsible for payment of costs associated with his or her required training and examination.

For initial certification of an environmental officer, the division shall require from an applicant:

Proof of completed training and a passing score on the examination from a division-approved environmental officer training and examination program; and

Payment of a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

For annual renewal of the environmental officer certificate, the division shall require from a certified environmental officer:

Proof of completed continuing education from an approved environmental officer training program in compliance with all applicable rules of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission; and

Payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2011. Environmental officer authority.

An environmental officer under this subchapter may perform one (1) or more of the following duties to ensure compliance with and enforcement of this subchapter:

Enter public or private property within the state to inspect suspected illegal dump sites, littering, or related complaints;

Enter public or private property to collect evidence of illegal dumping of solid waste and littering and present the evidence to the prosecuting attorney or a court of competent jurisdiction where the offense was committed; and

Perform all other duties specified in this subchapter necessary for the administration and enforcement of this subchapter.

An environmental officer shall not have the power of arrest.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2012. Issuing an environmental citation.

An environmental officer shall use the uniform environmental citation form under § 8-6-2009 to issue a citation for an alleged environmental violation under this subchapter.

An environmental officer may issue a citation for an alleged environmental violation of this subchapter to an alleged violator within the territorial jurisdiction of the environmental officer's employer.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2013. Filing an environmental citation.

A citation for an alleged environmental violation issued by an environmental officer shall be filed in a district court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the alleged environmental violation was committed.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2014. Serving an environmental citation.

A citation for an alleged environmental violation issued under this subchapter shall be served in person or by mailing a copy of the citation by certified mail, restricted delivery, to either the address obtained from evidence collected from the environmental violation location or to the last known address of the alleged violator.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2015. Hearing on an environmental citation — Penalties.

Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the alleged violator shall appear before the district court named within the citation at the location and time designated in the citation.

The initial hearing shall occur no later than thirty (30) days after the time period expires for remediation of the alleged environmental violation.

If the alleged environmental violation is remediated by the alleged violator within the time period established under § 8-6-2016 using the procedure under this subchapter, the district court shall dismiss the matter from the docket without hearing.

If the environmental officer extends the time period for remediation under § 8-6-2016(c), the district court shall reschedule the hearing for not more than thirty (30) days after the extension for remediation.

A district court having jurisdiction over a citation issued by an environmental officer may issue penalties under § 8-6-204 and may grant an available remedy referenced in this subchapter unless the remedy is not available to the district court.

A judgment entered under this subchapter:

May be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment; and

Is a final decision for purposes of appellate review.

A person against which the judgment is entered may appeal the decision to circuit court.

A judgment entered under this subchapter does not preclude claims under § 8-6-206 by another person.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2016. Remediation procedures for environmental citations.

The environmental officer shall set the time period an alleged violator has to remove the solid waste or otherwise remediate the environmental violation.

The time period shall not exceed thirty (30) days from the date of the environmental citation.

To determine the time period, the environmental officer shall consider without limitation:

The severity of the environmental violation;

The size of the environmental violation;

The ability of the alleged violator to remove the solid waste and otherwise remediate the environmental violation; and

Any other factor that affects the alleged violator's capability to remove the solid waste and otherwise remediate the environmental violation.

The environmental officer may extend the time period under subsection (a) of this section if the alleged violator has exercised due diligence to remediate the environmental violation but cannot complete the remediation within the time period set due to one (1) or more of the factors under subsection (b) of this section.

If the environmental officer extends the time period under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the environmental officer shall notify the district court with jurisdiction over the environmental citation hearing under § 8-6-2015 and request rescheduling of the hearing.

If the alleged violator removes the solid waste from the location or otherwise remediates the environmental violation, the alleged violator shall present to the environmental officer a cost statement.

If the alleged violator has removed the solid waste or remediated the environmental violation and presented a cost statement to the environmental officer, the environmental officer shall file an affidavit with the district court that establishes that the environmental violation has been remediated and the environmental citation is withdrawn.

The affidavit shall include the cost statement and the results of an investigation that the environmental officer has completed at the location of the environmental violation.

After filing the affidavit under subsection (e) of this section, the environmental officer shall notify the district court that the hearing required under § 8-6-2015 is unnecessary and the environmental citation has been withdrawn.

The environmental officer shall provide a copy of the affidavit under subsection (e) of this section to the Environmental Compliance Resource Program.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2017. Fines and costs.

If fines and costs are not paid for judgments for violations of this subchapter, the party that has not paid the fines and costs is subject to an administrative or civil enforcement action under law or rule, or both.

Sanctions for nonpayment may include administrative, civil, or criminal penalties as provided in the applicable law or rule, or both.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2018. Other authority unaffected.

This subchapter does not limit the authority of an employee of:

A municipality, city, county, or regional solid waste management district to issue a citation for a violation of a local ordinance or bylaw; or

A state agency, board, or commission with the statutory duty to enforce other state laws or rules, federal laws or regulations, or local ordinances.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.

8-6-2019. Agriculture exemption.

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., this subchapter, and § 8-6-901 et seq. do not apply to:

The disposal of solid waste if the disposal:

Results from operations of farms, grain elevators, cotton gins, and similar industries;

Is at a place where agricultural gleanings and crop residue that result from operations of farms, grain elevators, cotton gins, and similar industries are being land applied in accordance with current management practices of the industries or the agricultural community; and

Has been authorized and consented to by the landowner; or

A landowner who disposes of solid waste on the property where the solid waste results from agricultural or farming operations or household operations.

The exemptions under subsection (a) of this section do not apply to a disposal of solid waste if the disposal:

Creates:

An illegal dump site;

A public or private nuisance; or

A fire, health, or safety hazard to the public; or

Involves the open dumping of garbage.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 1.